bhojpuri.dix
    <pardef n="छ/ू__optative_ilA">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुइला</l>
          <r>ू<s n="v" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुइला</l>
          <r>ू<s n="v" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुवVल</l>
          <r>ू<s n="v" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p2" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुवVल</l>
          <r>ू<s n="v" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p2" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुअVला</l>
          <r>ू<s n="v" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुअVन</l>
          <r>ू<s n="v" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुइला</l>
          <r>ू<s n="v" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुइला</l>
          <r>ू<s n="v" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुवVलु</l>
          <r>ू<s n="v" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p2" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुवVलु</l>
          <r>ू<s n="v" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p2" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुअVलि</l>
          <r>ू<s n="v" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुअVनि</l>
          <r>ू<s n="v" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="हो/__optative_ilA">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इला</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इला</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ॊल</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ॊल</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ॊला</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लन</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इला</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इला</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लू</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लू</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लै</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लिन</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सो/__optative_ilA">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इला</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इला</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>वVल</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>वVल</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अVला</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अVलन</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इला</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इला</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>वVलु</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>वVलु</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>वVलइ</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>वVलिन</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="सो">
      <i>सो</i>
      <par n="सो/__optative_ilA" />
    </e>
    <e lm="हो">
      <i>हो</i>
      <par n="हो/__optative_ilA" />
    </e>
    <e lm="छ">
      <i>छ</i>
      <par n="छ/ू__optative_ilA" />
    </e>
